Washington statutes.
RCW 18.39.350

Violations—Penalty—Consumer protection—Retail installment contracts.

Any person who violates or fails to comply with, or aids or abets any person in the violation of, or failure to comply with any of the provisions of this chapter is guilty of a class C felony pursuant to chapter 9A.20 RCW. Any such violation constitutes an unfair practice under chapter 19.86 RCW and this chapter and conviction thereunder is grounds for license revocation under this chapter and RCW 18.235.110. Retail installment contracts under this chapter shall be governed by chapter 63.14 RCW.

[ 2002 c 86 s 220; 1989 c 390 s 11; 1982 c 66 s 13.]

NOTES:

Effective dates—2002 c 86: See note following RCW 18.08.340.

Part headings not law—Severability—2002 c 86: See RCW 18.235.902 and 18.235.903.

Effective dates—Transfer of records, files, and pending business—Savings—1982 c 66: See notes following RCW 18.39.240.

Unlawful business practices—Penalty: RCW 18.39.220.